Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-546
Offenses relating to baitfish; violation;
penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful (a) to take baitfish except
for use as bait or (b) for any person except an aquaculturist or bait dealer
to buy, sell, barter, offer to buy, sell, or barter, or have in his or her
possession baitfish for any purpose whatsoever except for use as bait. No
baitfish shall be taken from reservoirs, lakes, or bayous except as provided
in rules and regulations of the commission.

(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and pass commission orders pursuant to
section 37-314 pertaining to the taking, transportation, possession,
buying, selling, and bartering of baitfish.

(3) Any person violating this section or the rules and regulations adopted
and promulgated or commission
orders passed under this section shall be guilty of a Class III
misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 3, p. 426;

C.S.1929, § 37-503;

Laws 1943, c. 94, § 12, p. 330;

R.S.1943, § 37-503;

Laws 1957, c. 148, § 1, p. 486;

Laws 1961, c. 174, § 1, p. 516;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 10, p. 586;

Laws 1973, LB 331, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 73, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 89;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 37-503;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 266;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 77;

Laws 2013, LB499, § 14.